src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
* +Sem/Act = Activity
* +Sem/Adr = Webadr
* +Sem/Amount = Amount; pile, amount of lynx, amount of food, one fifteenth, ten percent
* +Sem/Ani = Animate; dog, reindeer, teddy bear,ndragon, lice
* +Sem/Ani-fish = fisk
* +Sem/Aniprod = Animal Product; sweat, reindeer skin, lice egg, blood for making dumplings, pee
* +Sem/Body = Bodypart; ear, bone, ear canal, artificial leg, mustache, nervous system
* +Sem/Body-abstr = Non-physical body part; Sjel, ånd, reason, soul, voice, eyesight, conscience
* +Sem/Build = Building; house, museum, Sámi tent, nest, sandcastle
* +Sem/Build-room = Room in a building, typically place to be
* +Sem/Buildpart = Part of building; closet, room, door, balcony, pool, office
* +Sem/Cat = Category; name, subjunction, suffix, password, existential sentence
* +Sem/Clth = Clothes/Clothing; shirt, hat, theater costume, shawl, seatbelt, diaper
* +Sem/Clth-jewl = Jewelery and similar; watch, sunglasses, ring, necklace, crown
* +Sem/Clthpart = Part of clothes; knapp, søm, pocket (OBS! Ctain-abstr), bottom part of an article of clothing, upper part of trousers, seam, button
* +Sem/Ctain = Container; suitcase, terrarium, closet, container, gas tank
* +Sem/Ctain-abstr = Abstract container; bank account, fund, account, loan fund, pot, bank account
* +Sem/Ctain-clth = Pocket
* +Sem/Curr = Currency; not money, euro, US dollar, denar, Danish crown, currency
* +Sem/Dance = Dance; swing, rumba, ballet, belly dance, war dance
* +Sem/Date = Date
* +Sem/Dir = Direction like GPS-kursa / Direction; GPS course, stock exchange price, graph, tendency, starboard
* +Sem/Domain = Domain like politics, reindeerherding (a system of actions), anthropology, punk rock, biology, linguistics, medicine
* +Sem/Drink = Drink; tea, beer, UHT milk, soda, communion wine
* +Sem/Dummytag = Default tag for uncategorized nouns
* +Sem/Edu = Educational event; skiing high school skiing academy, course, music lesson, lesson, master
* +Sem/Event = Event; wedding, meeting, competition, election, festival
* +Sem/Feat = Feature; Árvu, age difference, homosexuality, femininity, identity, congruence
* +Sem/Feat-measr = Measurable feature; radius, diameter, volume, circumference, perimeter, frequency
* +Sem/Feat-phys = Physiological feature; size, color, height, shape, weight, horsepower
* +Sem/Feat-psych = Psychological feature; authority, nature, childishness, creativity, arrogance
* +Sem/Fem = Female name
* +Sem/Food = Food; bread, vegetarian food, flour, tobacco, salt/ mat, krydder
* +Sem/Food-med = Medicine; birth-control pill, asthma medicine, medicine, penicillin, vaccine/ medisin eks: hodetabelett
* +Sem/Fruit = Fruit and fruit-like edibles/ frukt,bær, salat
* +Sem/Furn = Furniture; throne, chair, table, altar, trampoline
* +Sem/Game = Game; biŋgo bingo, TV game, flipper, paintball, chess
* +Sem/Geom = Geometrical object; triangle, triangle, tetrahedron, asymptote, star
* +Sem/Group = Animal or Human Group; family, herd, group, indigenous people, delegation
* +Sem/Hum = Human
* +Sem/ID = ID
* +Sem/Ideol = Ideology; nomadism, buddhism, feminism, christianity, fanaticism
* +Sem/Lang = Language; South Sámi, mother tongue, Maori, Yiddish, second language
* +Sem/Mal = Male name
* +Sem/Mat = Material for producing things; paper, steel, wood, leather, wool/ eks: mineral, nikkel,plast, kalvskinn
* +Sem/Measr = Measure; unit of volume, quarter meter, hour, minus degree, wátta watt
* +Sem/Money = Has to do with money; wages, not Curr(ency), treasure, belongings, debt, food price, bill, pension / penger,depositum, gevinst, stipend
* +Sem/Obj = Object; thing, cup, thing, toy, painting
* +Sem/Obj-clo = Cloth; carpet, flag, curtain, silk sheets, napkin
* +Sem/Obj-el = (Electrical) machine or apparatus; player, lamp, TV, radio, oven
* +Sem/Obj-ling = Object with something written on it: kort,biletter
* +Sem/Obj-play = Play object: ball eks:vollyball,fotball, snøball
* +Sem/Obj-rope = flexible ropelike object; barbed wire, thread, rope, cable, dental floss
* +Sem/Obj-surfc =  Surface object; blackboard, drawing paper, canvas, board (for playing board games), (money) bill
* +Sem/Org = Organisation; newspaper, supreme court, company, museum, administration
* +Sem/Part = Feature, part of something; half, part, percent, rest, tenth
* +Sem/Perc-emo = Emotional perception; fear, feeling of identity, empathy, sadness, working motivation
* +Sem/Perc-phys = Physical perception; shoulder pain, gass smell, sleep (during the night), need of sleep, hunger
* +Sem/Plant = Plant; lichen, plant, cucumber, bluebell, poisonous mushroom
* +Sem/Plantpart = Plant part; twig, leaf, root, seed, pine trunk
* +Sem/Plc = Place; world, nature, airport, workplace, fireplace
* +Sem/Plc-abstr = Abstract place; bachelor level, job market, third place, Troms website, address
* +Sem/Plc-elevate = Elevated place; mountain, peak, mountain top, scree, volcano
* +Sem/Plc-line = Place limitations; national border, border, finish line, stop line, equator
* +Sem/Plc-water = Water; river, lake, polar sea, sea, well
* +Sem/Pos = Position (as in social position job); 50% position, presidency, fixed position, kindergarten place, role in society
* +Sem/Process = Process
* +Sem/Prod = Product
* +Sem/Prod-audio = Audio product; yoik, roar, Beatles song, Bible psalm, blues
* +Sem/Prod-cogn = Cognition product; thought, decision, knowledge, lack of understanding, requirement
* +Sem/Prod-ling = Linguistic product; message, question, agreement, translation, criticism
* +Sem/Prod-vis = Visual product; picture, film, TV series, documentary, art
* +Sem/Rel = Relation; relation, dependency, subordination, analogy, equivalence
* +Sem/Route = Route-like place; street, path, corridor, bridge, winter path
* +Sem/Rule = Rule or convention; cultural tradition, abortion law, EU rule, law of cosines, fair play
* +Sem/Semcon = Abstract semantic concept; result, objective, reason, alternative, case
* +Sem/Sign = Sign (e.g. numbers, punctuation); ID number, ČSV letters, quotation mark, hieroglyph, symbol
* +Sem/Sport = 
* +Sem/State = State; hurry, captivity, anarchy, biodiversity, chaos
* +Sem/State-sick = Illness; allergy, cold, autism, dementia, somnambulism
* +Sem/Substnc = Substance; Water, sand, air, smoke, carbohydrate, vitamin, dust
* +Sem/Sur = Surname
* +Sem/Time = Time; áigi time, April, half an hour, Tuesday, deadline
* +Sem/Time-clock = Time
* +Sem/Tool = Prototypical tool for repairing things; axe, knife, fire striker, plastic hammer, wrench
* +Sem/Tool-catch = Tool used for catching; artificial fly, fishing net for cod, fishing rod, lasso used in wintertime, mouse trap
* +Sem/Tool-clean = Tool used for cleaning; broom, vegetable brush, toothbrush, cleaning equipment
* +Sem/Tool-it = Tool used in IT/tool within IT; IT infrastructure, analyzer, searching function, computer program, browser
* +Sem/Tool-music = Musical instrument; shaman drum, guitar, violin, musical instrument, jaw harp
* +Sem/Tool-write = Writing tool; colored pen, pencil, chalk, paintbrush, paint
* +Sem/Txt = Written document; paper, book, letter, e-mail, song
* +Sem/Veh = Vehicle; car, boat, sled, vehicle, draft reindeer, bicycle
* +Sem/Wpn = Weapon; rifle, bow, sword, arrow, war axe
* +Sem/Wthr = The Weather or the state of ground; cloudy weather, wind, driving conditions, night sunlight, rain shower
* +Sem/Year = year (i.e. 1000 - 2999), used only for numerals

### Multiple Semantic tags

Multiple semantic tags are written as one tag, with the different semantic values separated by an underline `_`.

All used combinations must be declared below, and the list must be manually maintained. The tags are ordered alphabetically, both the list and the semantic values within one tag.

* +Sem/Act_Domain =
* +Sem/Act_Fruit = frukt og handling
* +Sem/Act_Plc = handling og plass
* +Sem/Act_Route = handling og vei
* +Sem/Act_Event = Hendelse
* +Sem/Act_Tool-it = hendelse og it verktøy
* +Sem/Ani_Body = eks. dødt hode på rein
* +Sem/Ani_Body-abstr_Hum = dyrekropp, abstrakt begrep på mennesker, menneske
* +Sem/Ani_Buildpart = dyr og bygningsdel
* +Sem/Ani_Group = gruppe med dyr
* +Sem/Ani_Group_Hum =
* +Sem/Ani_Hum =
* +Sem/Ani_Obj-el =
* +Sem/Ani_Plc_Txt =
* +Sem/Ani_Time =
* +Sem/Ani_Tool =
* +Sem/Ani_Veh = dyr + kjöretöy eks hest
* +Sem/Aniprod_Hum =
* +Sem/Aniprod_Plc_Route =
* +Sem/Body_Food =
* +Sem/Body_Hum = kroppsdeler, mennesker
* +Sem/Body_Mat = kroppsdeler og dudtjie matriell
* +Sem/Body_Measr =
* +Sem/Body_Obj_Tool-catch =
* +Sem/Body_Plc =
* +Sem/Body_Plc-elevate =
* +Sem/Buildpart_Ctain_Obj =
* +Sem/Build_Clthpart =
* +Sem/Build_Edu_Org =
* +Sem/Build_Org =
* +Sem/Cat_Group_Hum_Plc =
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Curr =
* +Sem/Clth-jewl_Curr_Obj =
* +Sem/Ctain-abstr_Org =
* +Sem/Ctain-clth_Plant =
* +Sem/Ctain-clth_Veh =
* +Sem/Ctain_Furn =
* +Sem/Ctain_Tool =
* +Sem/Curr_Obj =
* +Sem/Domain_Hum =
* +Sem/Domain_Money =
* +Sem/Drink_Plant =
* +Sem/Edu_Event = eks: seminar, søndagsskole
* +Sem/Edu_Geom =
* +Sem/Edu_Hum =
* +Sem/Edu_Mat = utbildning og mat
* +Sem/Edu_Org =
* +Sem/Event_Plc-elevate =
* +Sem/Feat-measr_Plc =
* +Sem/Feat-phys_Tool-write =
* +Sem/Feat-psych_Hum =
* +Sem/Feat-psych_Plc =
* +Sem/Feat_Plant =
* +Sem/Food_Plant = tobakk
* +Sem/Furn_Time =
* +Sem/Game_Obj-play = leker eks: snøballkastning.sekkelek
* +Sem/Geom_Obj =
* +Sem/Group_Hum =
* +Sem/Group_Hum_Plc = gruppe mennesker tilsammens eks: konfirmasjonsleir
* +Sem/Group_Hum_Plc-abstr =
* +Sem/Hum_Lang = human and language
* +Sem/Hum_Lang_Plc = eks menneske, nord/sør, lulesamisk etc.
* +Sem/Hum_Mat_Tool =
* +Sem/Hum_Org = menneske og organisasjon
* +Sem/Hum_Veh =
* +Sem/Hum_Tool =
* +Sem/Lang_Tool =
* +Sem/Mat_Obj-clo =
* +Sem/Mat_Plant = material, plante eks bomull
* +Sem/Mat_Txt =
* +Sem/Measr_Obj_Time =
* +Sem/Measr_Sign =
* +Sem/Measr_Time = år, mnd, uke, time, minutt
* +Sem/Money_Obj =
* +Sem/Obj-ling_Obj-surfc =
* +Sem/Hum_Obj =
* +Sem/Obj_State =
* +Sem/Obj_Veh =
* +Sem/Org_Plc =
* +Sem/Org_Prod-audio =
* +Sem/Org_Prod-cogn =
* +Sem/Org_Prod-vis =
* +Sem/Org_Rule =
* +Sem/Org_Txt =
* +Sem/Part_Prod-cogn =
* +Sem/Plant_Plantpart =
* +Sem/Plc-abstr_Route =
* +Sem/Plc_Pos =
* +Sem/Plc_Route =
* +Sem/Plc_Substnc =
* +Sem/Plc_Substnc_Wthr =
* +Sem/Plc_Txt =
* +Sem/Plc_Wthr =
* +Sem/Prod-audio_Txt =
* +Sem/Prod-cogn_Txt =
* +Sem/Semcon_Wthr =
* +Sem/Substnc_Wthr =
* +Sem/Time_Wthr =
* +Sem/Domain_Txt =

### Other tags

|              Tag | Explanation
|                    --- | ---
|  +MWE | multi word expressions, goes to abbr
|  +Span | used for numerical expressions denoting spans or intervals, like 5-10, 2012-2015, etc

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.

|              Flag | Explanation
|                    --- | ---
|  @P.Px.add@ | Giving possibility for Px-suffixes (all except from Nom 3.p)
|  @R.Px.add@ | Requiring P.Px.add-flag for Px-suffixes (all except from Nom 3.p)
|  @P.Nom3Px.add@ |  Giving possibility for Px-suffixes Nom 3.p
|  @R.Nom3Px.add@ | Requiring P.Nom3Px.add flag for Px-suffixes Nom 3.p
|  @P.Pmatch.Backtrack@ | Used on single-token analyses; tell hfst-tokenise/pmatch to backtrack by reanalysing the substrings before and after this poin in the form (to find combinations of shorter analyses that would otherwise be missed)
|  @D.ErrOrth.ON@  | asdf
|  @C.ErrOrth@ | asdf
|  @P.ErrOrth.ON@ | asdf

## Derivation tags and derivation position tags in a derivation row

Derivations in the same position are mutually exclusive (can not be combined), whereas
tags in different positions can be combined, so that position 1 derivations must
precede position 2 derivations, and so on.
